Utah statutes.
53C-4-203.   Easements on trust lands -- Director to establish rules.

(1)  The director shall establish rules for the issuance of easements on, through, and over any trust land, and may establish price schedules.

(2)  A patent for trust lands is subject to any valid existing easement or public right-of-way.

